Wisconsin, session 2025, AB428.
do enact as follows:AB428,11Section 1. 71.07 (6e) (a) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB428,2,9271.07 (6e) (a) 2. b. An individual who had served on active duty under 3honorable conditions in the U.S. armed forces or in forces incorporated as part of 4the U.S. armed forces; who was a resident of this state at the time of entry into that 5active service or who had been a resident of this state for any consecutive 5-year 6period after entry into that active duty service; who was a resident of this state at 7the time of his or her death; and who had either a service-connected disability 8rating of 100 at least 80 percent under 38 USC 1114 or 1134 or a 100 percent 9disability rating based on individual unemployability.AB428,210Section 2. 71.07 (6e) (a) 3. d. of the statutes is amended to read:AB428,3,21171.07 (6e) (a) 3. d. Has either a service-connected disability rating of 100 at 1least 80 percent under 38 USC 1114 or 1134 or a 100 percent disability rating based 2on individual unemployability.AB428,33Section 3. 71.07 (6e) (c) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB428,3,7471.07 (6e) (c) 4. If a claimant’s service-connected disability rating is less than 5100 percent, the amount of the credit claimed under this subsection may not exceed 6the amount determined by multiplying the claimant’s property taxes by a 7percentage that equals the eligible veteran’s service-connected disability rating.AB428,48Section 4. 71.07 (6e) (c) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB428,3,12971.07 (6e) (c) 5. For an individual whose service-connected disability rating is 10less than 100 percent, the amount of the credit claimed under this subsection may 11not exceed the amount of the property taxes paid on the first $350,000 of the 12property’s assessed value for the taxable year to which the claim relates.AB428,513Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.AB428,3,1514(1) The University of Wisconsin Missing-in-Action Recovery and 15Identification Project. AB428,3,1616(a) In this subsection:AB428,3,17171. “Board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System.AB428,3,19182. “MIA Recovery Project” means the University of Wisconsin Missing-in-19Action Recovery and Identification Project.AB428,3,2320(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.285 (1) (a), the board shall provide 21$180,000 in funding in each fiscal year of the 2025-27 fiscal biennium for the MIA 22Recovery Project to perform one or more missions for the recovery and identification 23of Wisconsin veterans who are missing in action.AB428,4,624(c) The MIA Recovery Project, acting through its representative, shall submit 1at the conclusion of the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, to the board, the joint committee 2on finance, the standing committees of each house of the legislature dealing with 3veterans matters, the governor, the department of veterans affairs, and the 4department of military affairs, a report on findings and the accounting of 5expenditures related to the MIA Recovery Project’s missions and missing-in-action 6cases, including all of the following:AB428,4,771. A detailed budget breakdown showing how funds were expended.AB428,4,882. A statement on the number of missing-in-action cases identified.AB428,4,1193. A description of all missing-in-action cases worked on during the 2025-27 10fiscal biennium, including current progress and future planned actions such as 11letters to the family or missions abroad.AB428,4,13124. A calculation of the cost to continue with additional MIA Recovery Project 13missions, identifying the data and methodology used to make the calculation.AB428,4,16145. Identification of the amount and source of all funds raised for the missions 15or missing-in-action cases that were in addition to the funding provided under par. 16(b).AB428,4,24176. A detailed description of the involvement of the federal department of 18defense in any missions or missing-in-action cases, along with information 19identifying all other missions or missing-in-action cases on which the MIA Recovery 20Project has worked with the federal department of defense in the past and all 21missions or missing-in-action cases on which the MIA Recovery Project expects to 22work with the federal department of defense in fiscal years 2027-28 and 2028-29, 23including any arrangements the MIA Recovery Project has made with the federal 24department of defense to continue with future missions or missing-in-action cases.AB428,5,717. A detailed description of the role of University of Wisconsin System 2students in the MIA Recovery Project, the missions or missing-in-action cases of the 3MIA Recovery Project, or in connection with the missions or missing-in-action cases 4of the MIA Recovery Project, including how students were utilized to accomplish 5the objectives of missions and missing-in-action cases, whether involved students 6were paid or received academic credit or neither, and whether the MIA Recovery 7Project provided any classroom instruction or coursework to involved students.AB428,68Section 6. Fiscal changes.AB428,5,169(1) Veterans housing and recovery program. In the schedule under s. 1020.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of veterans affairs under s. 1120.485 (2) (rm), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $900,000 12and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $1,050,000 to increase 13funding for supplies and services costs in the veterans housing and recovery 14program operated by the department of veterans affairs and for costs associated 15with leasing a different facility from which to operate the Chippewa Falls-based 16veterans housing and recovery program.AB428,717Section 7. Initial applicability.AB428,5,2318(1) Eligibility for the veterans and surviving spouses property tax 19credit. The treatment of s. 71.07 (6e) (a) 2. b. and 3. d. and (c) 4. and 5. first applies 20to taxable years beginning on January 1 of the year in which this subsection takes 21effect, except that if this subsection takes effect after July 31 this act first applies to 22taxable years beginning on January 1 of the year following the year in which this 23subsection takes effect.AB428,5,2424